Utah statutes.
16-16-206.   Certificate of good standing or authorization.
(1)  The division, upon request and payment of the required fee, shall furnish
any person that requests it a certificate of good standing for a limited
cooperative association if the records filed in the office of the division
show that the division has filed the association's articles of organization,
that the association is in good standing, and that the division has not filed
a statement of termination.
(2)  The division, upon request and payment of the required fee, shall furnish
to any person that requests it a certificate of authority for a foreign
cooperative if the records filed in the office of the division show that the
division has filed the foreign cooperative's certificate of authority, has not
revoked nor has reason to revoke the certificate of authority, and has not
filed a notice of cancellation.
(3)  Subject to any exceptions stated in the certificate, a certificate of
good standing or authority issued by the division establishes conclusively
that the limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative is in good
standing or is authorized to transact business in this state.
